Mississippi, session 2026, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known as the "Mississippi Open to Religion Act". SECTION 2.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-13-4.2, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-13-4.2.  (1)  (a) The board of trustees of a public school district or the governing board of a public charter school that is not operated by or affiliated with a religious organization shall adopt a policy requiring every campus of the district or school to provide students and employees with an opportunity to participate in a period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text on each school day in accordance with this section.  The period may involve opportunities for voluntary participation in individual or group activities. (b)  A policy adopted under this subsection shall include the following statement: "It is the policy of (Name of School District or Public Charter School) that every campus of (Name of School District or Public Charter School) shall provide a period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text as provided by this section.  Such period may involve opportunities for voluntary participation in individual or group activities." (c)  Policies adopted under this subsection must: (i)  Prohibit a student or employee of the public school district or public charter school from being permitted to participate in the period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text unless the employee on his own behalf or the parent or guardian of the student submits to the district or school a signed consent form that includes: 1.  An acknowledgment that the student or employee has a choice as to whether to participate in the period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text; 2.  A statement that the employee on his own behalf or parent or guardian of the student has no objection to participating in or hearing of the prayers or readings offered during the period; and 3.  An express waiver of the right to bring a claim under state or federal law arising out of the adoption of a policy under this section, including a claim under the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or a related state or federal law, releasing the district or school and district or school employees from liability for those claims brought in state or federal court; (ii)  Prohibit the provision of a prayer or reading of the Bible or other religious text over a public address system; and (iii)  Specify that a period of prayer or reading of the Bible or other religious text may not be a substitute for instructional time. (2)  An employee on his own behalf or the parent or guardian of a student may revoke consent provided under subsection (l)(c) by informing the appropriate school administrator, as determined by the school district or public charter school.  An employee or student for whom consent has been revoked under this subsection: (a)  May not participate in the period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text until the employee or parent or guardian of the student submits to the district or school a new consent form under subsection (l)(c); and (b)  Remains bound by the waiver described in subsection (1)(c)(i)3. (3)  A policy adopted under subsection (1): (a)  Must include provisions ensuring a prayer or reading of the Bible or other religious text is not knowingly or intentionally provided in the physical presence of, within the hearing of, or in another manner which would constitute an injury in fact within the meaning of the United States or Mississippi Constitution of 1890 on a person for whom a signed consent form has not been submitted under subsection (1)(c) or has been revoked under subsection (2); and (b)  In order to comply with this subsection (3), may allow that the period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text be provided: (i)  Before or after normal school hours; or (ii)  In areas within school facilities or on school premises designated through rules and regulations adopted by the local school board, which govern such activities, provided that the time of use of the designated areas does not interfere with instruction of other programs authorized by the school district during the normal school hours as prescribed in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (b). (4)  (a)  The Attorney General, on request from a school board or governing board of a public charter school, shall: (i)  Provide advice on best methods for a district or school to comply with the requirements of this section; (ii)  Provide a model consent form that may be used for purposes of providing consent under subsection (1)(c); and (iii)  Defend the district or school in a cause of action arising out of the adoption of a policy under subsection (1). (b)  If the Attorney General defends a district or public charter school under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the state shall be liable for the expenses, costs, judgements or settlements of claims arising out of the representation. The Attorney General may settle or compromise any claims under this subsection. The state may not be liable for any expenses, costs, judgements or settlements of any claims arising out of the adoption of a policy under subsection (1) against a district or school not being represented by the Attorney General. (5)  This section does not prohibit a student or employee of the district or school from participating in prayer or reading the Bible or other religious text during a period of the school day that is not designated as a period of prayer and reading of the Bible or other religious text. (6)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with Article 8, Section 208 Mississippi Constitution of 1890. Nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict or limit a student's right to pray or engage in other religious activities or religious expressions as provided in Sections 37-12-7, 37-13-4, 37-13-4.1 and 37-13-8, or those provided by the Free Exercise Clause of the First Amendment to the United States Constitution. SECTION 3.  Section 37-12-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-12-7.  Students in public schools may pray or engage in religious activities or religious expression before, during and after the school day in the same manner and to the same extent that students may engage in nonreligious activities or expression. Students may organize prayer groups, religious clubs, "see you at the pole" gatherings, or other religious gatherings before, during and after school to the same extent that students are permitted to organize other noncurricular student activities and groups.  Religious groups must be given the same access to school facilities for assembling as is given to other noncurricular groups without discrimination based on the religious content of the students' expression.  If student groups that meet for nonreligious activities are permitted to advertise or announce meetings of the groups, the school district may not discriminate against groups that meet for prayer or other religious speech.  A school district may disclaim school sponsorship of noncurricular groups and events in a manner that neither favors nor disfavors groups that meet to engage in prayer or religious speech. Students in public schools may wear clothing, accessories and jewelry that display religious messages or religious symbols in the same manner and to the same extent that other types of clothing, accessories and jewelry that display messages or symbols are permitted. SECTION 4.  Section 37-13-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-4.  It shall be lawful for any teacher or school administrator in any of the schools of the state which are supported, in whole or in part, by the public funds of the state, to permit the voluntary participation by students or others in prayer.  Nothing contained in this section shall authorize any teacher or other school authority to prescribe the form or content of any prayer.  The provisions of this section shall not be construed to amend or repeal the provisions of Section 37-13-4.1 but shall be considered as supplemental and in addition to the provisions of Section 37-13-4.1. SECTION 5.  Section 37-13-4.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-4.1.  (1)  The legislative intent and purpose for this section is to protect the freedom of speech guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, to define for the citizens of Mississippi the rights and privileges that are accorded them on public school property, other public property or other property at school-related events; and to provide guidance to public school officials on the rights and requirements of law that they must apply.  The intent and purpose of the Legislature is to accommodate the free exercise of religious rights of its student citizens in the public schools and at public school events as provided to them by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and the judicial interpretations thereof as given by the United States Supreme Court. (2)  On public school property, other public property or other property, invocations, benedictions or nonsectarian, nonproselytizing student-initiated voluntary prayer shall be permitted during compulsory or noncompulsory school-related student assemblies, student sporting events, graduation or commencement ceremonies and other school-related student events. (3)  This section shall not diminish the right of any student or person to exercise his rights of free speech and religion, including prayer, as permitted by the United States Constitution, on public school property, other public property or other property, at times or events other than those stated in subsection (2) of this section. (4)  The exercise of the rights guaranteed under subsection (2) of this section shall not be construed to indicate any support, approval or sanction of the contents of any such prayer, invocation, benediction or other activity, or be construed as an unconstitutional use of any public property or other property by the State of Mississippi or any agency, department, board, commission, institution or other instrumentality thereof or any political subdivision of the state, including any county or municipality and any instrumentality thereof.  The exercise of these rights on public school property, other public property or on other property for school-related activities, by students or others, shall not be construed as the promotion or establishment of any religion or religious belief. (5)  The provisions of this section are severable.  If any part of this section is declared invalid or unconstitutional, that declaration shall not affect the part or parts that remain. SECTION 6.  Section 37-13-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-8.  (1)  In each public school classroom, the local school governing board may authorize a brief period of quiet reflection for not more than sixty (60) seconds at the opening of school upon every school day. (2)  The moment of quiet reflection authorized by subsection (1) of this section is not intended to be and shall not be conducted as a religious service or exercise but is considered an opportunity for a moment of silent reflection. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.